Utah statutes.
35A-3-103.   Division responsibilities.

The division shall:

(1)  administer public assistance programs assigned by the Legislature and the governor;

(2)  determine eligibility in accordance with the requirements of this chapter for public assistance programs assigned to it by the Legislature or the governor;

(3)  cooperate with the federal government in the administration of public assistance programs;

(4)  administer the Utah state employment service in accordance with Section 35A-3-115;

(5)  provide for the compilation of necessary or desirable information, statistics, and reports;

(6)  perform other duties and functions required by law;

(7)  monitor the application of eligibility policy;

(8)  develop personnel training programs for more effective and efficient operation of all programs under the administration of the division;

(9)  provide refugee resettlement services;

(10)  provide child care assistance for children; and

(11)  provide services and support that enable clients to qualify for affordable housing in cooperation with:

(a)  the Utah Housing Corporation;

(b)  the Housing and Community Development Division; and

(c)  local housing authorities.

